Arkansas, session 2025, SB599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-9-104(c), concerning the collection of
adoption information, is amended to read as follows:
(c) Before the entry of an interlocutory or a final decree of
adoption, the petitioner shall complete the adoption information sheet and
return it to the clerk.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 9-9-205(a)(1)-(3), concerning jurisdiction
over a petition for the adoption of a minor under the Revised Uniform
Adoption Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Jurisdiction of adoption of minors:
(1) The state shall possess jurisdiction over the adoption of a
minor if the person seeking to adopt the child, or the child, is a resident
of this state.
(2) For purposes of this subchapter:
(A) A child under the age of six (6) months shall be
considered a resident of this state if the:
*LJH275*
04-07-2025 12:24:56 LJH275

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB599
(i) Child's birth mother resided in Arkansas for
more than four (4) months immediately preceding the birth of the child;
(ii) Child was born in this state or in any border
city that adjoins the Arkansas state line or is separated only by a navigable
river from an Arkansas city that adjoins the Arkansas state line; and
(iii) Child remains in this state until the
interlocutory decree has been entered, or in the case of a nonresident
adoptive family, upon the receipt of approval pursuant to the Interstate
Compact on the Placement of Children, § 9-29-201 et seq., the child and the
prospective adoptive parents may go back to their state of residence and
subsequently may return to Arkansas for a hearing on the petition for
adoption;
(B) A child over the age of six (6) months shall be
considered a resident of this state if the child:
(i) Has resided in this state for a period of six
(6) months;
(ii) Currently resides in Arkansas; and
(iii) Is present in this state at the time the
petition for adoption is filed and heard by a court having appropriate
jurisdiction; and
(C) A person seeking to adopt is a resident of this state
if the person:
(i) Occupies a dwelling within the state;
(ii) Has a present intent to remain within the state
for a period of time; and
(iii) Manifests the genuineness of that intent by
establishing an ongoing physical presence within the state together with
indications that the person's presence within the state is something other
than merely transitory in nature.
(3)(A) If the juvenile is the subject matter of an open case
filed under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., the
adoption petition shall be filed in that case.
(B) The circuit court shall retain jurisdiction to issue
orders of adoption, interlocutory or final, when a juvenile is placed outside
the State of Arkansas.

04-07-2025 12:24:56 LJH275

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB599
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 9-9-212(a)(2), concerning the entry of an
order for an adoption after the period for withdrawal of consent has elapsed
under the Revised Uniform Adoption Act, is amended to read as follows:
(2) No orders of adoption, interlocutory or final, may be
entered prior to the period for withdrawal.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 9-9-213, as amended by 2025 Acts No. 139,
concerning the required residence of a minor who is the subject of a petition
for adoption under the Revised Uniform Adoption Act, is amended to read as
follows:
9-9-213. Required residence of minor.
(a)(1) In an adoption where the child is not in the custody of the
Department of Human Services, a final decree of adoption shall not be issued
and an interlocutory decree of adoption does not become final until the minor
to be adopted has lived in the home for at least six (6) months after
placement by an agency or for at least six (6) months after:
(A) Placement by a child placement agency licensed under
the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, § 9-28-401 et seq.; or
(B) The petition for adoption is filed.
(2) This subsection does not apply if the minor to be adopted
is:
(A) The stepchild of the petitioner; or
(B) Less than six (6) months of age at the time the
petition was filed.
(b) In an adoption where the child is in the custody of the
department, a final decree of adoption shall not be issued and an
interlocutory decree of adoption does not become final until the minor to be
adopted has lived in the home for at least six (6) months unless:
(1) The minor to be adopted must reside outside of the home to
receive medically necessary health care;
(2) The minor to be adopted is less than six (6) months of age;
or
(3) The Director of the Division of Children and Family Services
waives the residency requirement for a minor to be adopted when the minor is
sixteen (16) years of age or older and is participating in a life skills,
technical, or vocational program.
04-07-2025 12:24:56 LJH275

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB599

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 9-9-214(c), concerning the issuance of a
decree for adoption after the period of time for the withdrawal of consent
and relinquishment have passed and the adoption is in the best interest of
the individual to be adopted under the Revised Uniform Adoption Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(c) If at the conclusion of the hearing the court determines that the
required consents have been obtained or excused and the required period for
the withdrawal of consent and withdrawal of relinquishment have has passed
and that the adoption is in the best interest of the individual to be
adopted, it may (1) issue a final decree of adoption; or (2) issue an
interlocutory decree of adoption which by its own terms automatically becomes
a final decree of adoption on a day therein specified, which day shall not be
less than six (6) months nor more than one (1) year from the date of issuance
of the decree, unless sooner vacated by the court for good cause shown.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 9-9-215 is amended to read as follows:
9-9-215. Effect of decree of adoption.
(a) A final decree of adoption and an interlocutory decree of adoption
which has become final, whether issued by a court of this state or of any
other place, have has the following effect as to matters within the
jurisdiction or before a court of this state:
(1) Except with respect to a spouse of the petitioner and
relatives of the spouse, to relieve the biological parents of the adopted
individual of all parental rights and responsibilities, and to terminate all
legal relationships between the adopted individual and his or her biological
relatives, including his or her biological parents, so that the adopted
individual thereafter is a stranger to his or her former relatives for all
purposes. This includes inheritance and the interpretation or construction of
documents, statutes, and instruments, whether executed before or after the
adoption is decreed, which do not expressly include the individual by name or
by some designation not based on a parent and child or blood relationship.
However, in cases where a biological or adoptive parent dies before a
petition for adoption has been filed by a step-parent of the minor to be
adopted, the court may grant visitation rights to the parents of the deceased
biological or adoptive parent of the child if such parents of the deceased
04-07-2025 12:24:56 LJH275

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB599
biological or adoptive parent had a close relationship with the child prior
to the filing of a petition for step-parent adoption, and if such visitation
rights are in the best interests of the child. The foregoing provision shall
not apply to the parents of a deceased putative father who has not legally
established his paternity prior to the filing of a petition for adoption by a
step-parent. For the purposes of this section, “step-parent” means an
individual who is the spouse or surviving spouse of the biological or
adoptive parent of a child but who is not a biological or adoptive parent of
the child.
(2) To create the relationship of parent and child between
petitioner and the adopted individual, as if the adopted individual were a
legitimate blood descendant of the petitioner, for all purposes including
inheritance and applicability of statutes, documents, and instruments,
whether executed before or after the adoption is decreed, which do not
expressly exclude an adopted individual from their operation or effect.
(b) An interlocutory decree of adoption, while it is in force, has the
same legal effect as a final decree of adoption. If an interlocutory decree
of adoption is vacated, it shall be as though void from its issuance, and the
rights, liabilities, and status of all affected persons which have not become
vested shall be governed accordingly.
(c) Sibling visitation shall not terminate if the adopted child was in
the custody of the Department of Human Services and had a sibling who was not
adopted by the same family and before adoption the circuit court in the
juvenile dependency-neglect or families-in-need-of-services case has
determined that it is in the best interests of the siblings to visit and has
ordered visitation between the siblings to occur after the adoption.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 9-9-219 is amended to read as follows:
9-9-219. Application for new birth record.
Upon entry of a final decree of adoption or an interlocutory decree of
adoption that does not require a subsequent hearing, the clerk of the court
shall prepare an application for a birth record in the new name of the
adopted individual and forward the application to the appropriate vital
statistics office of the place, if known, where the adopted individual was
born and forward a copy of the decree to the Division of Vital Records for
statistical purposes. The division may issue a birth certificate for any
04-07-2025 12:24:56 LJH275

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB599
child born in a place whose law does not provide for the issuance of a
substituted certificate.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 9-9-220(a), concerning the termination of
parental rights by virtue of the entry of a decree of adoption under the
Revised Uniform Adoption Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a) With the exception of the duty to pay child support, the rights of
a parent with reference to a child, including parental right to control the
child or to withhold consent to an adoption, may be relinquished and the
relationship of parent and child terminated in or prior to an adoption
proceeding as provided in this section. The duty of a parent to pay child
support shall continue until an interlocutory a decree of adoption is
entered.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 9-14-237(a)(1), concerning the duty of a
payor parent to pay child support automatically terminating by operation of
law, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Unless a court order for child support specifically extends
child support after these circumstances, a payor parent's duty to pay child
support for a child shall automatically terminate by operation of law:
(A) When the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age
unless the child is still attending high school;
(B) If the child is still attending high school, upon the
child's high school graduation or the end of the school year after the child
reaches nineteen (19) years of age, whichever is earlier;
(C) When the child:
(i) Is emancipated by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
(ii) Marries; or
(iii) Dies;
(D) Upon the marriage of the parents of the child to each
other; or
(E) Upon the entry of a final decree of adoption or an
interlocutory decree of adoption that has become final under the Revised
Uniform Adoption Act, § 9-9-201 et seq., and, thereby relieves relieving the
payor parent of all parental rights and responsibilities.
04-07-2025 12:24:56 LJH275

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB599

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 9-27-306(a)(4), concerning jurisdiction to
issue an order of adoption for a juvenile placed outside of the State of
Arkansas under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, is amended to read as
follows:
(4) The court shall retain jurisdiction to issue orders of
adoption, interlocutory or final, if a juvenile is placed outside the State
of Arkansas.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 23-98-106(a)(8)(A), concerning medical
insurance coverage for adopted minors, is amended to read as follows:
(8)(A) Every policy issued pursuant to this chapter which covers
the insured and members of the insured's family shall include coverage for
newborn infant children of the insured from the moment of birth, and for
adopted minors from the date of the interlocutory decree of adoption.

SECTION 12. DO NOT CODIFY. Effect on interlocutory decrees of
adoption issued before act.
(a) This act shall only affect a decree entered after the effective
date of this act.
(b) An interlocutory decree entered by a court of competent
jurisdiction before the effective date of this act shall remain valid
according to the terms set forth by the court.

/s/C. Tucker











04-07-2025 12:24:56 LJH275